Louisiana, session 2026, SB39.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3556(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3556. Licensure; qualifications; provisional licensure
* * *
F. The board shall make available to any graduate of a state-approved,
Louisiana-based school for massage therapy a provisional license for immediate
use upon graduation at an established massage therapy business registered with
the board. The provisional license shall be active for one three-month term and
shall not be renewed. Any facility that employs a massage therapist who is
operating under a provisional license shall notify a client of the licensure status
of a provisionally licensed massage therapist prior to the client receiving any
services from that massage therapist. A provisionally licensed massage therapist
may only work at a facility that employs a massage therapist licensed pursuant
to Subsection A of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.